ottoman_verb.foma
define Alphabet [ ا | ب | پ | ت | ث | ج | چ | ح | خ | د | ذ | ر | ز | ژ | س | ش | ص | ض | ط | ظ | ع | غ | ف | ق | ك | گ | ڭ | ل | م | ن | و | ه | ی | ي ];
define Vowels [ ا | ه | ى | ي | و ];
define NonVowels [ ب | پ | ت | ث | ج | چ | ح | خ | د | ذ | ر | ز | ژ | س | ش | ص | ض | ط | ظ | ع | غ | ف | ق | ك | گ | ڭ | ل | م | ن ];

! To eliminate negative aorist gelme(z)m conflict.
define Zclear   [ م ز] -> [م] || _ "^" [م] ,, 
                [م ا ز] -> [ م ا ] || _ "^" [م] ,,
                [ م ز] -> [م ي] || _ "^" [ز] ,, 
                [م ا ز] -> [م ا ي] || _ "^" [ز] ; 


! Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

read lexc ottoman_verb.lexc
define Lexicon

define Grammar Lexicon           .o.
               Zclear .o.
               Cleanup        ;

regex Grammar;
